New York, session 2025-2026, S5600.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 404 of the personal property law, 2 as amended by chapter 883 of the laws of 1980, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. A seller may, in a retail instalment contract or obligation, 5 contract for and, if so contracted for, the holder thereof may charge, 6 receive and collect a credit service charge computed on the principal 7 balance of the contract or obligation from the date thereof to and 8 including the date when the final instalment is payable, at the rate or 9 rates agreed to by the buyer, but such credit service charge shall not 10 exceed the interest rate established pursuant to section fourteen-a of 11 the banking law. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09567-01-5